Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-259
Running water in rivers and ravines; right to use.

The right to the use of running water flowing in any river or stream or down any canyon or ravine may be acquired by appropriation by any person.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 13, p. 850;

C.S.1922, § 8463;

C.S.1929, § 46-613;

R.S.1943, § 46-259.

The right to appropriate water for irrigation purposes is limited to waters of natural streams. Rogers v. Petsch, 174 Neb. 313, 117 N.W.2d 771 (1962).

Under the irrigation act of 1889, a water right for purposes of irrigation need not have been attached to any particular tract of land. Vonburg v. Farmers Irr. Dist., 132 Neb. 12, 270 N.W. 835 (1937).